Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Early Intervention Services

200.650.
Legislative findings.

The General Assembly hereby finds and declares that there is an urgent and substantial need:

To enhance the development of all infants and toddlers with disabilities in the Commonwealth of Kentucky in order to minimize developmental delay, and to maximize individual potential for adult independence;

To enhance the capacity of families to meet the needs of their infants and toddlers with disabilities;

To reduce the educational costs by minimizing the need for special education and related services after infants and toddlers with disabilities reach school age;

To reduce future social services costs and to minimize the likelihood of institutionalization of individuals with disabilities;

To prevent secondary impairments and disabilities by improving the health of infants and toddlers, thereby reducing health costs for the families and the state; and

To comply with federal law as it pertains to services for infants and toddlers with disabilities and their families.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 313, § 1, effective July 15, 1994.

200.652.
Legislative declaration of policy.

It is the intent of the General Assembly that the policy of the Commonwealth of Kentucky shall be:

To reaffirm the importance of the family in all areas of the child’s development and to reinforce the role of the family in the decision making processes regarding their children;

To provide assistance and support to the family of an infant or toddler with a disability that addresses the individual needs of that family;

To develop and implement a statewide, comprehensive, coordinated, multidisciplinary, interagency system of early intervention services for all infants and toddlers with disabilities and their families;

To enhance the capacity to provide quality early intervention services and expand and improve existing early intervention services being provided to infants and toddlers with disabilities;

To facilitate the coordination of payment for early intervention services from federal, state, local, and private insurance coverage, and the use of sliding fee scales; and

To coordinate and provide individualized early intervention services to infants and toddlers with disabilities and their families.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 313, § 2, effective July 15, 1994.

200.654.
Definitions for KRS 200.650 to 200.676.

As used in KRS 200.650 to 200.676, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Awards and contracts” means the state and federal funds designated by the cabinet for projects relating to planning, resource development, or provision of direct early intervention services, as defined in this section, to infants and toddlers with disabilities and their families;

“Cabinet” means the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;

“Child find” means a system to identify, locate, and evaluate all infants and toddlers with disabilities who are eligible for early intervention services, determine which children are receiving services, and coordinate the effort with other state agencies and departments;

“Council” means the Kentucky Early Intervention System Interagency Coordinating Council;

“District” means one (1) of the fifteen (15) area development districts;

“District early intervention committee” means an interagency coordinating committee established within each of the fifteen (15) area development districts to facilitate interagency coordination at the district level;

“Early intervention services” means services for infants and toddlers with disabilities and their families delivered according to an individualized family service plan developed by the child multidisciplinary team to meet the developmental needs of eligible children, as defined in this section, and provided by entities receiving public funds using qualified personnel. The individualized family services plan is developed and the services are provided in collaboration with the families and, to the maximum extent appropriate, in natural environments, including home and community settings in which infants and toddlers without disabilities would participate. These services are necessary to enable the child to reach maximum potential. Services to be made available shall include but not be limited to the following:

Screening services;

Evaluation services;

Assessment services;

Service coordination;

Transportation and related costs for accessing early intervention services;

Family services including counseling, psychological, and social work services;

Health services including medical services for diagnostic and evaluation purposes only;

Nutrition services;

Occupational therapy services;

Physical therapy services;

Communication development services;

Sensory development services;

Developmental intervention services;

Assistive technology services; and

Respite services;

“Early intervention system” means the management structure established in KRS 200.654 to 200.670 and which is comprised of the interdependent array of services and activities for the provision of a statewide, comprehensive, coordinated, multidisciplinary, interagency program for infants and toddlers with disabilities and their families;

“Individual family service plan” means the singular comprehensive written service plan developed by the child’s multidisciplinary team, with the child’s parents serving as fully participating members of the team, to be followed by all agencies and other entities involved in providing early intervention services to an infant or toddler with disabilities and the child’s family;

“Infants and toddlers with disabilities” and “eligible children” mean children from birth to thirty-six (36) months of age in need of early intervention services as a result of one (1) of the following circumstances:

The child is experiencing developmental delays, as measured by diagnostic instruments and procedures in one (1) or more of the following skill areas: physical; cognitive; communication; social or emotional; or adaptive development;

The child has a diagnosed physical or mental condition which has a high probability of resulting in developmental delay; or

The child has a diagnosis of pervasive developmental disorder;

“Multidisciplinary team” means the child-specific group responsible for determining the services needed by the infant or toddler with disabilities and the child’s family, and development of the individualized family services plan. The team for each child shall include the parent or guardian of the child and individuals representing at least two (2) applicable disciplines which may include but need not be limited to the following: physical therapy; speech therapy; social work; nursing; or education;

“Point of entry” means an easily identifiable, highly accessible nonstigmatized entry into services; and

“Qualified service provider” means an entity, including but not limited to an individual, program, department, or agency, responsible for the delivery of early intervention services to eligible infants and toddlers with disabilities and their families who has met the highest minimum standards of state-approved or recognized certification, licensing, registration, or other comparable requirements that apply to the area in which the entity is providing early intervention services.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 313, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 426, § 174, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 162, § 2, effective July 15, 2002; 2005, ch. 99, § 210, effective June 20, 2005.

200.656.
Kentucky Early Intervention System.

There is hereby created in state government the Kentucky Early Intervention System to provide services for infants and toddlers with a disability and their families. For administrative purposes, the Kentucky Early Intervention System shall be attached to the Cabinet for Health and Family Services.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 313, § 4, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 426, § 175, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 211, effective June 20, 2005.

200.658.
Kentucky Early Intervention System Interagency Coordinating Council — Membership — Duties — Annual report — Conflict of interest to bar voting.

There is hereby created the Kentucky Early Intervention System Interagency Coordinating Council to be comprised of twenty-five (25) members to be appointed by the Governor to serve a term of three (3) years. The members of the council shall be geographically and culturally representative of the population of the Commonwealth and conform to the requirements of federal law and regulations. For administrative purposes, the council shall be attached to the Early Childhood Advisory Council. Pursuant to federal law and regulations, the membership shall be as follows:

At least five (5) members shall be the parents, including minority parents, of a child with a disability who is twelve (12) years of age or less, with at least one (1) being the parent of a child six (6) years of age or less. Each parent shall have knowledge of or experience with programs for infants and toddlers with disabilities;

At least five (5) members shall be public or private providers of early intervention services to infants and toddlers with disabilities;

At least one (1) member shall be a member of the Kentucky General Assembly;

At least one (1) member shall be representative of an entity responsible for personnel preparation and may include personnel from an institution of higher education or preservice training organization;

At least one (1) member shall be the commissioner or individual serving in a position of equivalent authority, or the designee, from the Department for Public Health;

At least one (1) member shall be the commissioner or individual serving in a position of equivalent authority, or the designee, from the Department for Medicaid Services;

At least one (1) member shall be the commissioner or individual serving in a position of equivalent authority, or the designee, from the Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities;

At least one (1) member shall be the commissioner or individual serving in a position of equivalent authority, or the designee, from the Department for Community Based Services;

At least one (1) member shall be the commissioner or designee of the Department of Education;

At least one (1) member shall be the commissioner or designee of the Department of Insurance;

At least one (1) member shall be a representative of the Office for Children with Special Health Care Needs;

At least one (1) member shall be a representative for the Head Start program; and

At least one (1) member shall be a representative of the Education of Homeless Children and Youth program.

In matters concerning the Kentucky Early Intervention System, the council shall advise and assist the cabinet in areas, including but not limited to the following:

Development and implementation of the statewide system and the administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to KRS 200.650 to 200.676;

Achieving the full participation, coordination, and cooperation of all appropriate entities in the state, including, but not limited to, individuals, departments, and agencies, through the promotion of interagency agreements;

Establishing a process to seek information from service providers, service coordinators, parents, and others concerning the identification of service delivery problems and the resolution of those problems;

Resolution of disputes, to the extent deemed appropriate by the cabinet;

Provision of appropriate services for children from birth to three (3) years of age;

Identifying sources of fiscal and other support services for early intervention programs;

Preparing applications to Part C of the Federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA) and any amendments to the applications;

Transitioning of infants and toddlers with disabilities and their families from the early intervention system to appropriate services provided under Part B of the Federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA) operated by the state Department of Education; and

Developing performance measures to assess the outcomes for children receiving services.

The council shall prepare no later than December 30 of each year an annual report on the progress toward and any barriers to full implementation of the Kentucky Early Intervention System for infants and toddlers with disabilities and their families. The report shall include recommendations concerning the Kentucky Early Intervention System, including recommendations of ways to improve quality and cost effectiveness, and shall be submitted to the Governor, Legislative Research Commission, and the Secretary of the United States Department of Education.

No member of the council shall cast a vote on any matter which would provide direct financial benefit to that member or otherwise give the appearance of the existence of a conflict of interest.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 313, § 5, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 426, § 176, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 14, § 30, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 308, § 7, effective July 14, 2000; 2003, ch. 69, § 5, effective June 24, 2003; 2006, ch. 180, § 7, effective July 12, 2006; 2010, ch. 24, § 302, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 146, § 30, effective July 12, 2012; 2012, ch. 158, § 23, effective July 12, 2012.

200.660.
Duties of the cabinet — Authority for administrative regulations.

The cabinet shall:

Administer all funds appropriated to implement the provisions of KRS 200.650 to 200.676;

Identify and coordinate all available financial resources for early intervention within the Commonwealth from federal, state, local, and private sources, including but not limited to:

Title V of the Federal Social Security Act relating to maternal and child health;

Title XIX of the Federal Social Security Act relating to Medicaid and the Early Periodic Screening Diagnostic and Treatment (EPSDT) program;

The Federal Head Start Act;

The Federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, Parts B and H;

The Federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1964 Title I, Chapter I, Part B, Subpart 2 as amended;

The Federal Developmentally Disabled Assistance and Bill of Rights Act, P.L. 100-146;

Other federal programs; and

Private insurance.

Develop a sliding fee scale of the cost of early intervention services to families, including those circumstances where no fee shall be required;

Make available, in addition to the services specified in KRS 200.654(7), social skill development and behavioral therapy services to infants and toddlers with a diagnosis of pervasive developmental disorders;

Enter into contracts with service providers within a local community aided by the district committee in identifying providers;

Develop procedures to monitor and evaluate services that are provided to infants and toddlers with disabilities and their families;

Develop procedures to ensure that early intervention services identified on the individualized family service plan are provided to eligible infants and toddlers with disabilities and their families in a timely manner pending resolution of any disputes among public agencies or service providers; and

In conjunction with the council and district early intervention committees, promulgate administrative regulations, pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A, necessary to implement the provisions of KRS 200.650 to 200.676.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 313, § 6, effective July 15, 1994; 2002, ch. 162, § 3, effective July 15, 2002.

200.662.
District early intervention committee — Membership — Duties. [Repealed]

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 313, § 7, effective July 15, 1994; 2000, ch. 14, § 31, effective July 14, 2000; 2012, ch. 146, § 31, effective July 12, 2012; repealed by 2020 ch. 36, § 44, effective July 15, 2020.

200.664.
Individualized family services plans.

Upon identification of an eligible infant or toddler with disabilities, representatives of the entity serving as point of entry shall cause a multidisciplinary team, as defined in KRS 200.654, to be created for the child and family.

The multidisciplinary team shall develop an individualized family service plan, as defined in KRS 200.654, for the child and family.

The individualized family services plan shall include:

A comprehensive multidisciplinary evaluation of the present level of development of and services needed by the child and an assessment of and plan to address the resources, priorities, and concerns of the family;

An explanation of the multidisciplinary evaluation and all service options to be made available in the family’s cultural language, in their primary mode of communication, or through a speech or language interpreter, whichever is necessary to facilitate comprehension.

The plan shall be developed within forty-five (45) days of the referral date of the child and family to the point of entry. If the completion of the initial evaluation and assessment is delayed and will not be completed within the forty-five (45) day time period due to the request of the child’s parent, illness of the child, or other reasonable circumstances beyond the control of the multidisciplinary team, the point of entry shall document the reason for the delay and shall develop and implement an interim individualized family service plan.

The informed written consent of the parent or guardian is required prior to the implementation of the plan. The parent may reject some services contained in the plan, however, no services to which the parent consents shall be withheld if the parent does not consent to all services in the plan.

The parent or guardian shall sign an agreement to accept responsibility for being an active participant in the child’s plan and for learning skills from providers so that the intensity and frequency of services may decline as the child reaches appropriate developmental levels and the family is able to do more for the child.

The plan shall be reviewed by members of the child’s current multidisciplinary team or other appropriate entities at no more than six (6) month intervals or more frequently if deemed appropriate based on the needs of the infant or toddler and the family. The child shall be evaluated at least annually to determine continuing program eligibility and the effectiveness of services provided to the child.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 313, § 8, effective July 15, 1994; 2003, ch. 69, § 6, effective June 24, 2003.

200.666.
Cabinet’s monitoring of personnel standards for service providers — Personnel development.

The cabinet shall monitor personnel standards for service providers to ensure the qualified service providers necessary to carry out the provisions of KRS 200.650 to 200.676 are appropriately and adequately prepared and trained in order to comply with the requirements of federal law and regulations.

The cabinet shall provide the components of a comprehensive system of personnel development which shall include:

Preservice and inservice training conducted on an interdisciplinary basis to the extent appropriate; and

Training provided for a variety of entities, including but not limited to, public and private providers, primary referral sources, parents, paraprofessionals, and persons who serve as professional service coordinators or case managers.

Training may include:

Implementing innovative strategies and activities for the recruitment and retention of early intervention service providers;

Promoting the preparation of early intervention providers who are fully and appropriately qualified to provide early intervention;

Training personnel to work in rural areas; and

Recruiting and training personnel to coordinate transition services for infants and toddlers with disabilities from an early intervention program to a preschool program.

The cabinet shall coordinate with other agencies in the provision of the comprehensive system of personnel development activities.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 313, § 9, effective July 15, 1994.

200.668.
Identification of eligible infants and toddlers.

The cabinet shall attempt to identify all infants and toddlers eligible for Kentucky Early Intervention System services through implementation of an aggressive child find effort to be coordinated with the child find efforts of the Department of Education as set forth in administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to KRS 156.070, 156.160, 157.220, 157.260, 167.015, and KRS Chapter 13A.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 313, § 10, effective July 15, 1994.

200.670.
Public awareness effort.

In order to ensure access to early intervention services, the cabinet shall establish an effective and continuous public awareness effort. The effort shall:

Be directed at a number of primary referral sources, utilizing a means and language which is understandable, accessible, responsive, and cognizant of the referral sources’ needs and their abilities to respond to those needs;

Reinforce the coordinated and family-centered nature of all early intervention programs within the comprehensive statewide system of services; and

Be relevant and meaningful to parents and to the general public.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 313, § 11, effective July 15, 1994.

200.672.
Rights of disabled child, parent, or guardian being served by the system.

Kentucky’s participation in Part C of the Federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act requires that an infant or toddler with a disability who is being served by the Kentucky Early Intervention System and the parent or guardian of that child shall have the following rights:

To a timely, multidisciplinary evaluation and assessment;

To appropriate early intervention services for children and families;

To refuse evaluation, assessment, or services;

To written notice before a change is made in the identification, evaluation, or placement of the child, or in the provision of services to the child or family;

To written notice before a refusal of services is made in the identification, evaluation, or placement of the child, or in the provision of services to the child or family;

To confidentiality of personally identifiable information, including the right of the parent or guardian to be provided written notice of, and written consent to, the exchange of information among agencies, consistent with federal and state laws;

To determine if any family member will accept or decline an early intervention service under KRS 200.650 to 200.676, in accordance with state law, without jeopardizing other early intervention services under KRS 200.650 to 200.676;

To review all records and, if appropriate, to amend records;

To bring an advocate or attorney into any and all dealings with the early intervention system; and

To administrative process and judicial review in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B to resolve complaints.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 313, § 12, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 318, §§ 92, 95, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 10, § 1, effective July 14, 2000.

200.674.
Restriction of use of early intervention funds — Maintenance of July 1, 1993 funding level.

The use of early intervention funds provided under KRS 200.650 to 200.676 shall not be used to supplant existing funds from other sources. All local and state programs for infants and toddlers with disabilities and their families shall maintain the funding which supported programs for infant and toddler and their families at levels as of July 1, 1993.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 313, § 13, effective July 15, 1994.

200.676.
Construction of KRS 200.650 to 200.676.

Nothing in KRS 200.650 to 200.676 shall be construed to permit the following:

The reduction of local, state, or federal medical or other assistance available for infants and toddlers with disabilities and their families;

The alteration of eligibility under Title V of the Federal Social Security Act relating to maternal and child health;

The alteration of eligibility under Title XIX of the Federal Social Security Act relating to Medicaid for infants and toddlers with disabilities; or

The reduction of early intervention services provided by any state department or agency.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 313, § 14, effective July 15, 1994.